Washington statutes.
RCW 39.84.100

Revenue bonds—Provisions.

(1) The principal of and the interest on any revenue bonds issued by a public corporation shall be payable solely from the funds provided for this payment from the revenues of the industrial development facilities funded by the revenue bonds. Each issue of revenue bonds shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates, and shall mature at such time or times as may be determined by the board of directors, and may be made redeemable before maturity at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the board of directors prior to the issuance of the revenue bonds or other revenue obligations.

(2) The board of directors shall determine the form and the manner of execution of the revenue bonds and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the revenue bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest. If any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any revenue bonds or any coupons ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the revenue bonds, the signature shall for all purposes have the same effect as if he or she had remained in office until delivery. The revenue bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, as provided in RCW 39.46.030, or both as the board of directors may determine, and provisions may be made for the registration of any coupon revenue bonds as to the principal alone and also as to both principal and interest and for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest. A public corporation may sell revenue bonds at public or private sale for such price and bearing interest at such fixed or variable rate as may be determined by the board of directors.

(3) The proceeds of the revenue bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the payment of all or part of the project cost of or for the making of a loan in the amount of all or part of the project cost of the industrial development facility for which authorized and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds or in the trust agreement securing the bonds. If the proceeds of the revenue bonds of any series issued with respect to the cost of any industrial development facility exceeds the cost of the industrial development facility for which issued, the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the debt service fund for the revenue bonds or used to purchase revenue bonds in the open market.

(4) A public corporation may issue interim notes in the manner provided for the issuance of revenue bonds to fund industrial development facilities prior to issuing other revenue bonds to fund such facilities. A public corporation may issue revenue bonds to fund industrial development facilities that are exchangeable for other revenue bonds when these other revenue bonds are executed and available for delivery.

(5) The principal of and interest on any revenue bonds issued by a public corporation shall be secured by a pledge of unexpended bond proceeds and the revenues and receipts received by the public corporation from the industrial development facilities funded by the revenue bonds pursuant to financing documents. The resolution under which the revenue bonds are authorized to be issued and any financing document may contain agreements and provisions respecting the maintenance or use of the industrial development facility covered thereby, the fixing and collection of rents, purchase price payments or loan payments, the creation and maintenance of special funds from such revenues or from revenue bond proceeds, the rights and remedies available in the event of default, and other provisions relating to the security for the bonds, all as the board of directors consider advisable which are not in conflict with this chapter.

(6) The governing body of the municipality under whose auspices the public corporation is created shall approve by resolution any agreement to issue revenue bonds adopted by a public corporation, which agreement and resolution shall set out the amount and purpose of the revenue bonds. Additionally, no issue of revenue bonds, including refunding bonds, may be sold and delivered by a public corporation without a resolution of the governing body of the municipality under whose auspices the public corporation is created, adopted no more than sixty days before the date of sale of the revenue bonds specifically, approving the resolution of the public corporation providing for the issuance of the revenue bonds.

(7) All revenue bonds issued under this chapter and any interest coupons applicable thereto are negotiable instruments within the meaning of Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code, Title 62A RCW, regardless of form or character.

(8) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, such bonds and interim notes may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 2011 c 336 s 814; 1983 c 167 s 115; 1981 c 300 s 10.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.